Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the Progressing Rural Economic
Prosperity Fund of the State Treasury created in Section 256 of
Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the sum of Fifteen Million
Dollars ($15,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
make needed upgrades to infrastructure on or near the grounds of a
primary commercial airport, categorized as a small-hub or larger,
centrally located in the state to maintain and enhance aerospace
capabilities and increase future economic development in the state.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1150 Page 2